Maryland, session 2025, SB0726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0726*

SENATE BILL 726
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Administration” means the Maryland Cannabis Administration established
under this title.
(C–1) “BONA FIDE LABOR ORGANIZATION” MEANS A LABOR ORGANIZATION
THAT COMPLIES WITH 29 U.S.C. § 431 AND IS ACTIVELY SPENDING RESOURCES TO
ORGANIZE EMPLOYEES OF A CANNABIS LICENSEE FOR THE PURPOSES OF
ADVOCATING FOR IMPROVED WORKING CONDITIONS.
(h) “Cannabis licensee” means a business licensed by the Administration to
operate in the cannabis industry.
(W–1) “LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT” MEANS AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN A BONA
FIDE LABOR ORGANIZATION AND A CANNABIS LICENSEE THAT PROHIBITS THE
LABOR ORGANIZATION FROM ENGAGING IN PICKETING, WORK STOPPAGES, OR
BOYCOTTS AGAINST THE LICENSED ENTITY.
36–202.
(a) The Administration shall:
(9) WHEN DETERMINING IF A LABOR ORGANIZATION IS A BONA FIDE
LABOR ORGANIZATION, CONSIDER WHETHER THE LABOR ORGANIZATION:
(I) IS THE BARGAINING REPRESENTATIVE FOR EMPLOYEES OF
A CANNABIS LICENSEE;
(II) IS A PARTY TO A BARGAINING AGREEMENT WITH A
CANNABIS LICENSEE;
(III) IS SPENDING SIGNIFICANT RESOURCES, INCLUDING
ASSIGNING PAID STAFF, TO ACTIVELY ORGANIZE EMPLOYEES OF A CANNABIS
LICENSEE;
(IV) HAS, WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 6 MONTHS, FILED LABOR
GRIEVANCES AGAINST A CANNABIS LICENSEE;

SENATE BILL 726 3
(V) HAS, WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 2 YEARS, ENGAGED IN
PICKETING, STRIKING, PUBLICLY THREATENING TO PICKET OR STRIKE, OR
PUBLICLY CALLING FOR CONSUMER BOYCOTTS AGAINST A CANNABIS LICENSEE;
(VI) IS BASED IN THE STATE OR MAINTAINS A PERMANENT STAFF
IN THE STATE; AND
(VII) IS AFFILIATED WITH A NATIONAL OR REGIONAL LABOR
COUNCIL THAT COVERS A REGION OF THE STATE;
[(9)] (10) adopt regulations necessary to carry out its duties under this
title; and
[(10)] (11) perform any other power authorized or duty required under this
title or any other provision of State law.
36–401.
(a) (1) A person must obtain a cannabis license issued by the Administration
to operate a cannabis business.
(2) A cannabis license issued under this subtitle:
(i) authorizes the holder of the license to operate a medical and
adult–use cannabis business;
(ii) is valid for 5 years on initial licensure and 5 years on renewal;
and
(iii) may be transferred only in accordance with Subtitle 5 of this
title.
(b) (1) The Administration shall:
(ii) on or before July 1, 2023, convert licenses that were issued to
medical cannabis growers, processors, and dispensaries, including those businesses
preapproved for licensure, to licenses to operate a medical and adult–use cannabis business
if:
1. a conversion fee is paid in accordance with § 36–403 of this
subtitle; and
2. the business complies with the ownership restrictions
under subsection (e) of this section;

SENATE BILL 726
(iv) issue dispensary licenses in a manner that encourages a
balanced geographic distribution based on population and market demand within a specific
county, as well as cross–jurisdictional market demand; [and]
(v) adopt regulations requiring licensees whose licenses were
converted by the Administration under item (ii) of this paragraph to reserve a specified
amount of cannabis for social equity licensees; AND
(VI) ADOPT REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION REGARDING LABOR PEACE AGREEMENTS.
(J) PRIOR TO THE RENEWAL OF A CANNABIS LICENSEE’S LICENSE FOR THE
FIRST TIME UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING A LICENSE CONVERTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE CANNABIS LICENSEE SHALL EXECUTE
A LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT AND, AFTER ITS LICENSE IS RENEWED, SHALL
MAINTAIN AND ABIDE BY THE LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT AS A CONDITION OF
LICENSURE.
36–411.
(a) (1) A protest against a license renewal may be filed with the
Administration by:
(I) at least 10 individuals who are:
[(i)] 1. residents, commercial tenants who are not holders of or
applicants for a license, or real estate owners; and
[(ii)] 2. located within 1,000 feet of the licensed premises; OR
(II) A BONA FIDE LABOR ORGANIZATION.
(2) A protest against a license renewal shall:
(i) be on the basis of:
1. a violation of this title;
2. a violation of civil or criminal law;
3. conduct by a licensee that creates or maintains conditions
that allow other individuals to act in a manner that disturbs the public peace, including:
A. obstruction of public rights–of–way by unruly crowds;

SENATE BILL 726 5
B. assault, battery, or other disorderly conduct that disturbs
the public peace;
C. vandalism; or
D. littering; or
4. any other violation established by the Administration by
regulation; and
(ii) be signed under oath.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.